Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 2. Food and Aquatic Farm Products.

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For milk, milk processing, and reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32.

For seafood processing and inspection, see 18 AAC 34.

Collateral references. —

35 Am. Jur. 2d, Food, § 2 et seq.

36A C.J.S., Food, § 10.

Sec. 17.20.010.
Definitions and standards for food.

When, in the judgment of the commissioner, honest and fair dealing in the interest of consumers will be promoted, the department shall adopt regulations fixing and establishing for food or class of food a reasonable definition and standard of identity, a reasonable standard of quality, and reasonable standards of fill of container.
In prescribing a definition and standard of identity for food or class of food in which optional ingredients are permitted, the department shall, for the purpose of promoting honesty and fair dealing in the interest of consumers, designate the optional ingredients which shall be named on the label.
The definitions and standards adopted shall conform as far as practicable to the definitions and standards adopted under authority of the federal act.
The department shall establish a mobile canned food inspection service available upon request to food packers or processors inside the state.

History.

(§ 9 ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For milk and milk products, see 18 AAC 32, art. 1.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

Sec. 17.20.013.
Hormone labeling for milk products.

Products offered for wholesale or retail sale in this state that contain milk, cream, or any product or byproduct of milk or cream and that have been processed and handled under the requirements of this section may be labeled “Milk in this product is from cows not treated with rBGH” or “Milk in this product is from cows not treated with rBST.” Labeling of milk products under this section may also include an indication that the milk used is “farmer certified rBGH-free” or “farmer certified rBST-free.” If a milk product label contains the rBGH or rBST language allowed under this subsection, the label must also state “No significant difference has been shown between milk derived from rBST treated and non-rBST treated cows.” Milk products offered for wholesale or retail sale in this state are not required to contain any further label information related to the use of rBGH or rBST in milk products.

The labeling described in (a) of this section may appear on the principal display panel of a packaged milk product, may be conspicuously attached to the container of a bulk product, or may appear in an advertisement for a milk product, including media advertising or displays or placards posted in retail stores. In this subsection,

“advertisement” means the representations disseminated in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or that are likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of the milk product;

“principal display panel” means that part of a label that is most likely to be displayed, presented, shown, or examined under normal and customary conditions of display for sale.

A dairy plant that purchases milk or cream to be used in milk products labeled under (a) of this section shall require an affidavit from producers supplying the milk. The producer or authorized representative of the producer shall sign the affidavit, and the affidavit must state that all cows used in the producer’s dairy operations have not and will not be treated with rBGH without advance written notice to the dairy plant of at least 30 days.

The affidavit required under (c) of this section must contain

the name and address of the producer;

the grade A milk permit number of the producer;

the name of the producer’s farm and its address if different from the address of the producer;

the telephone number of the producer;

the name of the dairy plant receiving the milk; and

a statement in substantially the following form:

A dairy plant shall keep the original affidavit provided under (c) of this section on file for a period of not less than two years. The affidavit and corresponding records shall be made available for inspection by the commissioner. If the milk product is to be labeled under (a) of this section, dairy plants supplying milk or cream to a processor or to a manufacturer of a milk product for use in the milk product shall supply the processor or manufacturer with a certificate stating that the producers of the supplied milk or cream have executed and delivered the affidavits as required by (c) of this section.

All milk or cream from non-rBGH-treated cows used in the manufacturing or processing of milk products labeled under (a) of this section, and milk or cream supplied by a producer using an affidavit under (c) of this section, shall be kept completely separate from any other milk or cream throughout all stages of storage, transportation, and processing until the resulting milk products are in final packaged form in a properly labeled container. The dairy plant and the processor or manufacturer at each stage shall keep records of the separation and make them available to the commissioner for inspection.

In this section,

“milk product” means any product that contains milk, cream, or any product or byproduct of milk or cream;

“recombinant bovine growth hormone” or “rBGH” means a growth hormone that is intended for use in bovine animals and that has been produced through recombinant DNA techniques described as “recombinant bovine somatotropin” or “rBST.”

State of Alaska) ) ss: Judicial District ) I, , as the owner or permit holder responsible for the dairy farm operation identified above, hereby certify as follows: (A) that no animals on the above farm are currently being treated with recombinant bovine somatotropin (rBST), also known as recombinant bovine growth hormone (rBGH); (B) that no animals on the above farm have received rBST treatments within the past 30 days; (C) that I will provide written notice to the buyer of my milk at least thirty (30) days in advance if I intend to use rBST on my dairy cattle; and (D) that I will not sell milk from animals added to my herd if those animals may have received rBST treatment within the previous 30 days. I declare, under oath, that the above statement is true and correct to the best of my knowledge. Producer Signature Subscribed and sworn to or affirmed before me at on . (date) Notary Public My Commission Expires

Click to view

History.

(§ 2 ch 68 SLA 1999)

Sec. 17.20.015
Shared ownership of milk-producing animals; raw milk.

An individual who has an ownership interest in a milk-producing animal may pay or reimburse another individual owner of the animal the costs incurred to

board, milk, and care for the animal; and

share raw milk and raw milk products produced from the milk with other owners of the animal.

A part owner of a shared milk-producing animal may share raw milk or a raw milk product produced from the milk of the animal only

with another owner of the animal who has provided the part owner with at least two means of contacting the other owner in the event of a foodborne illness;

if the raw milk or raw milk product is produced exclusively by the owners of the animal; and

if the raw milk or raw milk product is provided directly from one owner to another owner.

The department may not restrict or impose a requirement on the sharing or transfer of raw milk or a raw milk product between the owners of a milk-producing animal that is in addition to the provisions of this section.

In this section,

“raw milk” means milk that is not pasteurized;

“raw milk product” means raw milk or a product or byproduct of raw milk.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 2021)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 15, SLA 2021, which enacted this section, took effect on September 29, 2021.

Sec. 17.20.020.
Adulterated food.

Food is adulterated if

it bears or contains a poisonous or deleterious substance that may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added substance the food is not considered adulterated under this paragraph if the quantity of the substance does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;

it bears or contains added poisonous or added deleterious substance that is unsafe within the meaning of AS

17.20.030

;

it consists in whole or in part of a diseased, contaminated, filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance, or if it is otherwise unfit for food;

it has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions in which it may have become contaminated with filth, or in which it may have been rendered diseased, unwholesome, or injurious to health;

it is, in whole or in part, the product of a diseased animal or an animal that has died otherwise than by slaughter, or that has been fed upon the uncooked offal from a slaughterhouse;

its container is composed, in whole or in part, of a poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health.

Food is adulterated if

a valuable constituent has been omitted or abstracted in whole or part;

a substance has been substituted in whole or part for a valuable constituent;

damage or inferiority has been concealed;

a substance has been added or mixed or packed with it to increase its bulk or weight, or reduce its quality or strength, or make it appear better or of greater value than it is.

Confectionery is adulterated if it bears or contains an alcohol or nonnutritive article or substance except harmless coloring, harmless flavoring, harmless resinous glaze not in excess of four-tenths of one percent, harmless natural wax not in excess of four-tenths of one percent, harmless natural gum, and pectin. This subsection does not apply to confectionery containing less than one-half of one percent by volume of alcohol derived solely from the use of flavoring extracts, or to chewing gum containing harmless nonnutritive masticatory substances.

Food is adulterated if it bears or contains a coal tar color other than one from a batch which has been certified under authority of the federal act.

Food is not adulterated under this section solely because it contains industrial hemp, as defined in AS

03.05.100

, or an industrial hemp product.

History.

(§ 10 ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 9 ch 5 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For management and personnel, see 18 AAC 31, art. 3.

For equipment and utensils, see 18 AAC 31, art. 4.

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

For temporary food service, limited food service, kiosks, mobile food units, see 18 AAC 31, art. 6.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For markets, see 18 AAC 31, art. 8.

For milk and milk products, see 18 AAC 32, art. 1.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

For requirements for fishing vessels, tender vessels, buying stations, and processing facilities in response to oil contamination, see 18 AAC 34, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective April 13. 2018, added (e).

Collateral references. —

Liability of packer, foodstore, or restaurant for causing trichinosis. 96 ALR3d 451.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by foreign substance in beverage. 90 ALR4th 12.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by foreign object in food or food product. 1 ALR5th 1.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by food product containing object related to, but not intended to be present in, product. 2 ALR5th 189.

Sec. 17.20.030.
Tolerances for added poisonous ingredients.

A poisonous or deleterious substance added to food, except where the substance is required in the production of food or cannot be avoided by good manufacturing practice, is unsafe for purposes of the application of AS

17.20.020(a)(2)

.
When the substance is required or cannot be avoided, the department shall adopt regulations limiting the quantity of it to the extent necessary for the protection of public health. A quantity exceeding the limits fixed is unsafe for purposes of the application of AS

17.20.020(a)(2)

. While a regulation limiting the quantity of a substance in the case of any food is in effect, the food is not, by reason of bearing or containing an added amount of the substance, adulterated within the meaning of AS

17.20.020(a)(1)

.
In determining the quantity of the added substance to be tolerated in or on food, the department shall consider the extent to which the use of the substance is required or cannot be avoided in the production of each article and the other ways in which the consumer may be affected by that or other poisonous or deleterious substances.

History.

(§ 13 ch 129 SLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For milk and milk products, see 18 AAC 32, art. 1.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

Sec. 17.20.040.
Misbranded foods.

Food is misbranded if

its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;

it is offered for sale under the name of another food;

it is an imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the word “imitation” and, immediately thereafter, the name of the food imitated;

its container is made, formed, or filled so as to be misleading;

it is in package form unless it bears a label containing (A) the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; and (B) an accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; however, under (B) of this paragraph, reasonable variations are permitted, and exemptions for small packages shall be established by regulations prescribed by the department;

a word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed with the conspicuousness (as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices in the labeling) and in terms that make it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;

it purports to be or is represented as a food for which a definition and standard of identity has been prescribed by regulations as provided by AS

17.20.010

, unless (A) it conforms to the definition and standard, and (B) its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard and the common names of optional ingredients other than spices, flavoring, and coloring present in the food as required by regulation;

it purports to be or is represented as (A) a food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed by regulations, and its quality falls below that standard, unless its label bears, in the manner and form the regulations specify, a statement that it falls below that standard; or (B) a food for which a standard of fill of container has been prescribed by regulation as provided by AS

17.20.010

and it falls below the applicable standard of fill of container, unless its label bears, in the manner and form as the regulations specify, a statement that it falls below that standard;

it is not subject to the provisions of (7) of this subsection, unless it bears labeling clearly giving (A) the common or usual name of the food, if any, and (B) in case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each ingredient; except that, however, spices, flavorings, and colorings, other than those sold as such, may be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings, without naming each; however, to the extent that compliance with the requirements of (B) of this paragraph is impracticable, or results in deception or unfair competition, exemptions shall be established by regulations adopted by the department, but the requirements of (B) of this paragraph do not apply to food products that are packaged at the direction of purchasers at retail at the time of sale, the ingredients of which are disclosed to the purchasers by other means in accordance with regulations adopted by the department;

it purports to be or is represented for special dietary uses, unless its label bears information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties the commissioner determines to be, and by regulations prescribes as, necessary in order fully to inform purchasers as to its value for those uses;

it bears or contains artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical preservative, unless it bears labeling stating that fact; however, to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this paragraph is impracticable, exemption shall be established by regulations adopted by the department;

the food is a farmed halibut, salmon, or sablefish product, unless

the product is labeled to identify the product as farmed fish raised outside the state, if the product is sold in a packaged form; or

the product is conspicuously identified as farmed fish raised outside the state, if the product is sold in an unpackaged form;

the labeling, advertisement, or identification of the food is inconsistent with the labeling, advertisement, or identification provisions of AS

17.20.048

or

17.20.049

;

the food is a genetically modified fish or genetically modified fish product unless

the food is conspicuously labeled to identify the fish or fish product as a genetically modified fish or fish product if the fish or fish product is sold in a packaged form; or

the food is conspicuously identified as a genetically modified fish or fish product if the fish or fish product is sold in an unpackaged form.

In this section,

“farmed halibut, salmon, or sablefish product” means a food product that contains halibut, salmon, or sablefish that is propagated, farmed, or cultivated in a facility that grows, farms, or cultivates finfish in captivity or under positive control but that is not a salmon hatchery that is owned by the state or that holds a salmon hatchery permit under AS

16.10.400

; in this paragraph, “positive control” has the meaning given in AS

16.40.199

;

“genetically modified fish” means

a finfish or shellfish whose genetic structure has been altered at the molecular level by means that are not possible under natural conditions or processes, including recombinant DNA and RNA techniques, cell fusion, gene deletion or doubling, introduction of exogenous genetic material, alteration of the position of a gene, or similar procedure;

the progeny of a finfish or shellfish described in (A) of this paragraph;

“genetically modified fish product” means a product prepared from a genetically modified fish.

History.

(§ 11 ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 164 SLA 1990; am §§ 1, 2 ch 8 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 146 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For markets, see 18 AAC 31, art. 8.

For milk and milk products, see 18 AAC 32, art. 1.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

Validity and construction of regulations dealing with misrepresentation in the sale of kosher food. 52 ALR3d 959.

Pre-emption of state food labeling legislation or regulation. 79 ALR Fed. 181.

Validity, under Commerce Clause (Article I, Section 8, Clause 3), of state statutes regulating labeling of food. 79 ALR Fed. 246.

Sec. 17.20.044.
Sale and labeling of frozen meat, fish, and poultry.

Meat, fish, or poultry that has been frozen may not be sold, represented, or advertised as a fresh food.

Meat, fish, and poultry that has been frozen must be labeled as a frozen food in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations that

require frozen food labels for meat, fish, and poultry that has been frozen; and

provide for the examination and inspection of meat, fish, and poultry to ascertain whether it has been frozen.

History.

(§ 11 ch 72 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For provision providing that “selling, falsely representing, or advertising meat, fish, or poultry that has been frozen as fresh food” is an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

Sec. 17.20.045.
Misbranding halibut.

No person may label or offer for sale any food fish product designated as halibut, with or without additional descriptive words, unless the food fish product is Hippoglossus or Hippoglossus stenolepsis.
A person who violates this section is guilty of misbranding food under provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1968)

Administrative Code. —

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

Sec. 17.20.048.
Labeling and advertisement of halibut, salmon, and sablefish products.

A person who sells halibut, salmon, or sablefish products at wholesale or retail in this state may label or advertise the product as being or containing a “wild” halibut, salmon, or sablefish product, an “antibiotic-free” halibut, salmon, or sablefish product, or a “hormone-free” halibut, salmon, or sablefish product, and may indicate that the product or the halibut, salmon, or sablefish in the product is free from added colors and additives, if the product or the halibut, salmon, or sablefish in the product

is harvested from a river or an ocean;

has not been raised in captivity under control for its entire life; and

is free from added colors and additives.

The labeling or advertising allowed for a halibut, salmon, or sablefish product by (a) of this section may appear on the principal display panel of a packaged product, may be conspicuously attached to the container of a bulk product, or may appear in an advertisement for the product, including media advertising and displays or placards posted in retail stores. In this subsection, “principal display panel” means the part of a label that is most likely to be displayed, presented, shown, or examined under normal and customary conditions of display for sale.

In this section, “halibut, salmon, or sablefish product” means halibut, salmon, or sablefish, or a product made from halibut, salmon, or sablefish.

History.

(§ 3 ch 8 SLA 2002)

Sec. 17.20.049.
Required identification of fish by retail food establishment.

Notwithstanding AS

17.20.048

, a retail food establishment shall state on the menu of prepared food products that it is selling whether the fish in a prepared food product is wild fish or farmed fish.

In this section,

“farmed fish” means fish that is propagated, farmed, or cultivated in a facility that grows, farms, or cultivates the fish in captivity or under positive control but that is not a salmon hatchery that is owned by the state or that holds a salmon hatchery permit under AS

16.10.400

; in this paragraph, “positive control” has the meaning given in AS

16.40.199

;

“fish” means finfish;

“prepared food product” means a food product that has been prepared by the retail food establishment selling the food product or by another person at the direction of the retail food establishment;

“retail food establishment” means a business that sells prepared food products to the general public for consumption on or off the premises, and includes a business that is, or contains on its premises, a restaurant, a delicatessen, a salad bar, or a bakery; “retail food establishment” does not include an establishment that is provided by

an employer primarily for the employees of the employer;

a school primarily for the students and employees of the school; or

a correctional facility primarily for persons held under official detention;

“wild fish” means a fish that

is harvested from a river, a lake, or an ocean;

has not been raised in captivity under control for its entire life; and

is free from added colors and additives.

History.

(§ 2 ch 146 SLA 2004)

Sec. 17.20.050.
Emergency permit control.

When the department finds after investigation that the distribution in the state of a class of food may, by reason of contamination with microorganisms during the manufacture, processing, or packing, be injurious to health, and that the injurious nature cannot be adequately determined after the articles have entered commerce, it, in that case only, shall adopt regulations providing for the issuance of permits to manufacturers, processors, or packers of that class of food, to which shall be attached the conditions governing the manufacture, processing, or packing of that class of food, for a temporary period of time as may be necessary to protect the public health.
After the effective date of the regulations, and during the temporary period, no person may introduce or deliver for introduction into commerce the food so manufactured, processed, or packed by any manufacturer, processor, or packer unless the manufacturer, processor, or packer of it holds a permit issued by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 12(a) ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.060.
Suspension and reinstatement of emergency permit.

The commissioner may suspend immediately upon notice a permit issued under AS

17.20.050

if it is found that the conditions of the permit have been violated.
The holder of a suspended permit may apply for the reinstatement of the permit, and the commissioner, immediately after prompt hearing and an inspection of the establishment, shall reinstate the permit if it is found that adequate measures have been taken to comply with and maintain the conditions of the permit as originally issued or as amended.

History.

(§ 12(b) ch 129 SLA 1949)

Sec. 17.20.065.
Seafood processing permits and plans of operation.

A person may not operate a seafood processing establishment or seafood processing vessel without a seafood processing permit issued by the department. A seafood processing permit issued under this section must be renewed annually.

A person may not operate a seafood processing establishment or a seafood processing vessel without a written hazard analysis critical control point plan that explains the procedures used at each critical control point in the operation of the seafood processing establishment or the seafood processing vessel. The department may review, and comment on, the completeness of the hazard analysis critical control point plan prepared for a seafood processing establishment or a seafood processing vessel; however, the department may not require annual submission of the plan unless a change in operation, product, or process necessitates a change in the plan. In this subsection, “critical control point” means a point, step, or procedure in a food process at which control can be applied, and a food safety hazard can as a result be prevented, eliminated, or reduced to acceptable levels.

History.

(§ 12 ch 72 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

For shellfish processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 2.

For smoked or smoke-flavored seafood products processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 3.

For thermal processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 4.

For direct-market fishing vessels, see 18 AAC 34, art. 5.

For requirements for fishing vessels, tender vessels, buying stations, and processing facilities in response to oil contamination, see 18 AAC 34, art. 6.

For direct-market land-based facilities, see 18 AAC 34, art. 7.

Sec. 17.20.066.
Seafood product quality standards and seals.

The Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute established in AS 16.51 shall design an “inspection” seal that may be used to signify that a seafood product has been packed in compliance with the requirements of a permit issued under AS

17.20.065

.

The Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute shall design a “premium quality” seal that may be used to signify that a seafood product has met the product specifications and standards under (d) of this section.

The commissioner shall authorize the use of an “inspection” seal for display on seafood products processed by a person who, at the time the products are processed, holds a permit to operate issued under AS

17.20.065

and who complies with regulations adopted under this chapter.

The commissioner, after consultation with the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute, shall develop product specifications and standards for the use of the “premium quality” seal on Alaska seafood products. The commissioner shall authorize a seafood processor to display a “premium quality” seal on products that qualify for the seal if the processor meets the requirements of regulations adopted under this chapter and has been issued a permit to operate under AS

17.20.065

.

A person may not display a seal under this section without authorization from the commissioner.

History.

(§ 13 ch 72 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

Sec. 17.20.067.
Seafood processing research.

The commissioner may conduct studies, research, experiments, and demonstrations, directly or through grants to or contracts with public or private agencies, organizations, or individuals to

improve sanitation practices in the processing of fish and fisheries products; and

develop improved techniques for surveillance and inspection activities under this chapter.

History.

(§ 13 ch 72 SLA 1998)

Sec. 17.20.070.
Inspection by department.

An officer or employee designated by the commissioner shall have access to a factory, aquatic farm, or establishment, the operator of which holds a permit from the commissioner, for the purpose of ascertaining whether the conditions of the permit are being complied with. Denial of access for inspection is ground for suspension of the permit until access is freely given.

History.

(§ 12(c) ch 129 SLA 1949; am § 14 ch 72 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For management and personnel, see 18 AAC 31, art. 3.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

For smoked or smoke-flavored seafood products processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 3.

For requirements for fishing vessels, tender vessels, buying stations, and processing facilities in response to oil contamination, see 18 AAC 34, art. 6.

Sec. 17.20.072.
Enforcement authority.

The commissioner is responsible for enforcing AS

17.20.005

—

17.20.075

, and may delegate that authority as appropriate. This section does not limit the authority of peace officers.

History.

(E.O. No. 51, § 19 (1981); am § 15 ch 72 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For food care, see 18 AAC 31, art. 2.

For management and personnel, see 18 AAC 31, art. 3.

For equipment and utensils, see 18 AAC 31, art. 4.

For sanitation and physical facilities, see 18 AAC 31, art. 5.

For temporary food service, limited food service, kiosks, mobile food units, see 18 AAC 31, art. 6.

For food processing, see 18 AAC 31, art. 7.

For markets, see 18 AAC 31, art. 8.

For reindeer slaughtering and processing, see 18 AAC 32, art. 3.

For seafood processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 1.

For shellfish processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 2.

For smoked or smoke-flavored seafood products processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 3.

For thermal processing, see 18 AAC 34, art. 4.

For direct-market fishing vessels, see 18 AAC 34, art. 5.

For requirements for fishing vessels, tender vessels, buying stations, and processing facilities in response to oil contamination, see 18 AAC 34, art. 6.

For direct-market land-based facilities, see 18 AAC 34, art. 7.

Sec. 17.20.075.
Definitions.

In AS

17.20.005

—

17.20.075

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of environmental conservation;

“department” means the Department of Environmental Conservation.

History.

(E.O. No. 51, § 19 (1981); am § 16 ch 72 SLA 1998)